California statutes. Financial Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 718, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

5618.

The commissioner may amend, alter, or revoke any permit issued by the commissioner, or temporarily suspend the rights of the association under such permit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 287, Sec. 10.   Effective July 6, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Issuance of Stock and Certificates [5620. - 5624.]

5620.

(a) A stock association may issue shares of common stock and preferred stock, with or without par value, and common and preferred stock may be divided into classes and the classes into series.

(b) Stock associations which have withdrawable shares outstanding as of the effective date of this section may continue to issue savings accounts in that form and the holders of these accounts shall have the same rights as they had before this section became law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5621.

(a) With the approval of the commissioner, a mutual association may amend its articles of incorporation to authorize the issuance of stock and may issue stock. Any amendment to the articles of incorporation and bylaws of an association which for the first time authorizes it to issue stock shall be approved by the vote or written assent of a majority of the total votes of members outstanding, except that the amendment shall require approval only of the commissioner and board of directors of an association if the commissioner finds that grounds exist for the appointment of a conservator for the association
 pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 8225.

(b) An amendment to the articles of incorporation of an association pursuant to this section may include provisions with respect to the surplus, reserves, and undivided profits of the association and in that case the surplus, reserves, and undivided profits shall be retained and disposed of in accordance with those provisions.

(c) The corporate existence of a mutual association which amends its articles of incorporation pursuant to this section to authorize the issuance of stock and which issues stock shall continue to be, and the resulting stock association shall be deemed to be, a continuation of the mutual association. The Legislature finds and declares that Section 563b.41 (d)(3) of Title 12 of the Code of Federal Regulations sets forth the law of this state with regard to the continuity of corporate existence in mutual association
 to stock association conversions and that this section has reflected that law from the time of the original adoption of Section 563b.41 of Title 12 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 868, Sec. 2.   Effective September 26, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

5622.

Capital stock of a stock association shall be issued pursuant to the following requirements:

(a) Except for stock issued pursuant to a stock dividend, stock split, reverse stock split, reclassification of outstanding stock into stock of another class, exchange of outstanding stock for stock of another class or other change affecting outstanding stock or an employee stock option plan or a plan of merger, consolidation, conversion from a mutual to a stock association, or other type of reorganization that has been approved by the commissioner, the consideration for
 the issuance of capital stock shall be money paid, debts or securities canceled or tangible or intangible property actually received either by the association or by a wholly owned subsidiary. The par value or stated value of stock shall be maintained as the permanent capital of the association and any additional amount paid in shall be credited to paid-in surplus.

(b) The aggregate par value or stated value of all outstanding shares of capital stock shall be the permanent capital of the association and except as otherwise specifically provided by this division, capital stock shall not be retired until final liquidation of the association.

(c) No association shall reduce the par or stated value of its outstanding capital stock without first obtaining the written approval of the commissioner, and approval shall be withheld if the reduction would cause the par or stated value of
 outstanding capital stock to be less than the minimum required by this division or would result in less than adequate statutory net worth as the commissioner may determine under Section 6475.

(d) No association shall retire any part of its capital stock unless the retirement is approved by the commissioner.

(e) No association shall make loans secured by its capital stock.

(f) With the written approval of the commissioner, an association may purchase its capital stock or may contract with a stockholder for purchase of stock upon the stockholder’s death. However, the purchase shall not reduce the net worth accounts of the association, or any of them, to an amount less than required by applicable law. An association which agrees with a stockholder to purchase that stockholder’s capital stock upon death may purchase
 insurance upon the life of the stockholder to fund or partially fund the purchase.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1162, Sec. 6.   Effective September 26, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

5623.

A mutual association may issue mutual capital certificates in accordance with regulations of the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5624.

An association may issue net worth certificates in accordance with applicable regulations of the Office of Thrift Supervision or the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1118, Sec. 23.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Association Name, Office [5650. - 5655.]

5650.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (a) of Section 201 of the Corporations Code and Division 1 of the Financial Code, the name of every association shall include either the words “savings association,” “savings and loan association,” “savings bank” or such other designation as the commissioner may approve. These words shall be preceded by an appropriate descriptive word or words approved by the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 868, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

5651.

(a) No certificate of approval of articles of incorporation of a proposed association having the same name as an association in existence in this state on the date an application is filed under Section 5401, or a name so nearly resembling it as to be likely to deceive, shall be issued by the commissioner, except to an association formed by the reincorporation, reorganization, or consolidation of the association with other associations, or upon the sale of the property or franchise of an association. The commissioner may presume that the use of any word or words already adopted, appropriated, or used in its corporate name by any
 association then existing in this state, except the words “the,” “and,” “mutual,” “guarantee,” “building,” “loan,” “savings,” “association,” or “bank,” constitutes such similarity of names as to be likely to mislead the public.

(b) An association shall not adopt or change to a name that will result in unfair competition or public confusion, or be deceptive, scandalous, or otherwise unsuitable.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5652.

Except as otherwise authorized under existing law, no person, unless lawfully authorized to do business in this state under the provisions of this division and who is actually engaged in carrying on a savings association business, shall:

(a) Do business under any name or title that contains the following terms:

(1) “Savings association.”

(2) “Savings bank.”

(3) “Savings and loan association.”

(4) “Building and loan association.”

(5) “Building association.”

(6) Any combination employing either or both of the words “building,” or “loan,” with one or more of the words “saving,” “savings,” or words of similar import.

(7) Any combination employing one or more of the words “saving,” “savings,” or words of similar import with one or more of the words “association,” “bank,” “institution,” “society,” “company,” “fund,” “corporation,” or words of similar import.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this subdivision, use of the term “savings bank” in a name or title is not prohibited to any person regulated by the
 provisions of Division 1 (commencing with Section 99), Division 7 (commencing with Section 18000), or under procedures and regulations promulgated by the Comptroller of the Currency, Federal Reserve Board, Office of Thrift Supervision, Federal Housing Finance Board, or Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation. Any reference to the term “savings bank” in this division is not intended to apply to any person other than persons authorized to do business in this state under this division.

(b) Use any name or sign or circulate or use any letterhead, billhead, circular or paper whatever, or advertise or represent in any manner that indicates or reasonably implies that the business is the character or kind of business carried on or transacted by an association or is likely to lead any person to believe that the business is that of an association.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 551.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

5653.

Upon application by the commissioner or any association, a court of competent jurisdiction may issue an injunction to restrain any person from violating or continuing to violate any of the provisions of Section 5652. Any person who violates any provision of Section 5652 shall be punished by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), and each day of violation shall constitute a separate offense. The prohibitions of Section 5652 shall not apply to any corporation or association formed for the purpose of promoting the interests of thrift institutions, the membership of which is comprised of thrift institutions, their officers, or other
 representatives.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5654.

(a) Without the prior approval of the commissioner, as provided in this division, no association shall do any of the following:

(1) Establish or maintain any office, other than its home office, which shall be in the location named in the certificate of authority.

(2) Change the location or designation of any office from its approved location or designation.

(3) Change its corporate name by amendment of its articles of incorporation and its
 certificate of authority. A change of name is subject to the same criteria as set out in Sections 5650 and 5651.

(4) Amend its articles of incorporation or bylaws.

(5) Establish or maintain a subsidiary.

(6) Acquire all or substantially all of the assets or savings account liabilities of a branch or branches of another financial institution.

(b) Applications for approval under this section shall be filed in the office of the commissioner, shall include information as prescribed by regulation or written instruction of the commissioner, and shall be accompanied by any filing fee prescribed by the commissioner pursuant to Section 9001.

(c) A public hearing may be held on applications filed
 under this section in accordance with procedures prescribed by law or by regulations adopted by the commissioner.

(d) No certificate of amendment or other certificate to amend the articles of incorporation of an association shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State unless there is attached thereto the certificate of the commissioner approving the certificate.

(e) Applicants filing under this division shall publish notice as prescribed by the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 718, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

5655.

No association shall advertise or hold itself out to the public as a bank. This subdivision shall not be construed to prohibit an association which is a savings bank from advertising or holding itself out to the public as a “savings bank.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 287, Sec. 12.   Effective July 6, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Conversions [5700. - 5718.]

5700.

A state association may convert itself into a federal association by following the procedure outlined in Sections 5701 through 5708.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5701.

At any regular or special meeting called to consider the conversion of an association into a federal association, in the case of a stock association, the stockholders entitled to vote and any members entitled to vote, by an affirmative majority of the votes cast in person or by proxy; and in the case of a mutual association the members, by action on a proposal approved by the members, may resolve to convert the association into a federal association.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5702.

Any executor, administrator, guardian, conservator of a natural person or receiver, and any fiduciary or trustee, and any public corporation, political subdivision, public instrumentality, charitable institution, educational and eleemosynary institution, trust company or financial institution, and any insurance company or cemetery association may, without obtaining court approval:

(a) Vote in person or by proxy in favor of or against converting a state association into a federal association, or may approve or disapprove the determination to so convert.

(b) Exchange any stock, savings accounts, or other rights or claims, for securities issued by the federal association, and hold the securities as legal investments.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5703.

Promptly after the meeting approving a conversion into a federal association, the association shall file in the office of the commissioner a certificate verified by the president or vice president and the secretary or assistant secretary of the association. The certificate shall contain a copy of the minutes of the meeting and a statement of the number of stockholders and members entitled to vote and the number voting to approve the determination to convert the association into a federal association. A like certificate shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5704.

A certified copy of the certificate required by Section 5703 filed in the office of the Secretary of State is presumptive evidence of the holding of the meeting, the action taken at the meeting, and of the approval of stockholders and members.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5705.

After the meeting of the stockholders and members, the association shall take any action necessary to make it a federal association, and promptly after receipt of the federal charter the association shall file in the office of the commissioner and in the office of the Secretary of State, a copy of the charter issued to it by the Office of Thrift Supervision or a certificate showing the organization of the association as a federal association certified by or on behalf of the Office of Thrift Supervision. Upon the filing of this instrument in the office of the Secretary of State the association ceases to be a state association and is a federal
 association.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1118, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------

5706.

At the time the conversion into a federal association becomes effective the association ceases to be supervised by this state and all of the property of the association, including all of its right, title, and interest in and to all property of every kind and character immediately, by operation of law and without any conveyance, or transfer and without any further act or deed, is vested in the association under its new name and style as a federal association and under its new jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5707.

The converted federal association shall have, hold, and enjoy the property mentioned in Section 5706 in its own right as fully and to the same extent as the property was possessed, held, and enjoyed by it as a state association and the federal association shall continue to be responsible for all of the obligations of the converted state association to the same extent as though the conversion had not taken place. The federal association is merely a continuation of the state association under a new name and new jurisdiction and the revision of its corporate structure as is considered necessary for its proper operation under the new

 jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5708.

Where a copy of a charter of a federal association, issued by the Federal Home Loan Bank Board pursuant to the laws of the United States was filed with the Secretary of State prior to September 13, 1941, with the intent of converting a building and loan association organized and existing under the laws of this state into a federal association, those conversions are validated, legalized, ratified and confirmed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5709.

Any federal association may convert itself into an association by following the procedure set forth in Sections 5710 through 5718.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 287, Sec. 12.5.   Effective July 6, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

5710.

At any regular or special meeting called to consider the action, the stockholders and members entitled to vote by an affirmative majority of the votes cast in person or by proxy, may resolve to convert a federal association into an association.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5711.

Copies of the minutes of the proceedings of the meeting of the stockholders or members in which they vote to convert into an association, verified by the president or vice president and the secretary or an assistant secretary, shall be filed promptly after the meeting in the office of the commissioner, and, in duplicate, with the federal home loan bank of which the association is a member.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5712.

The verified copies of the minutes of the meeting, when filed as required by Section 5711, are presumptive evidence of the holding and action of the meeting.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5713.

After a meeting as provided for in Section 5710, the federal association shall take or cause to be taken such action as shall make it an association in the manner prescribed and authorized by this division. The directors elected at the meeting shall file the documents with applicable fees and take such proceedings as are required by this division in the case of the original incorporation of an association. The decision for approval or denial shall be issued in writing. No association incorporated by conversion from a federal association is required to comply with any of the provisions of law or any regulations promulgated by the commissioner relating
 to the minimum amounts of capital required to be subscribed in connection with the original incorporation of an association under this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 361, Sec. 4.5.)
-------------------------------------------

5714.

The directors of an association converted from a federal association may insert in the articles of incorporation the following statement: “This association is incorporated by conversion from a federal savings and loan association. ”

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5715.

Promptly after the filing of the articles of incorporation with the Secretary of State, there shall be filed with the federal home loan bank of which the association is a member, two copies of the articles of incorporation, certified by the Secretary of State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5716.

Upon the filing of the articles of incorporation with the Secretary of State, the federal association ceases to be a federal association and is an association under the laws of this state. All of the property of the federal association, including all of its right, title, and interest in and to all property of every kind and character immediately, by operation of law and without any conveyance or transfer, and without any further act or deed, is vested in the association under its new name and style as an association and under its new jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5717.

The converted association shall have, hold, and enjoy the property mentioned in Section 5716 in its own right as fully and to the same extent as the property was possessed, held and enjoyed by it as a federal association and the converted association continues responsible for all of the obligations of the converted federal association to the same extent as though conversion had not taken place. The association is merely a continuation of the federal association under a new name and new jurisdiction and such revision of its corporate structure as is considered necessary for its proper operation under the new jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5718.

In the event stock is to be issued by the converted association, the commissioner may issue an organizing permit to the federal association or to the board of directors elected to serve after conversion, authorizing the association or the board of directors to take subscriptions to stock, to collect subscription payments and to impound the payments pending the issuance of stock, and authorizing the converted association to issue stock after the filing of its articles of incorporation with the Secretary of State. The commissioner may require that all stock to be initially issued be subscribed and fully paid. The commissioner may also issue a certificate of
 authority to the converted association to be effective upon filing of its articles of incorporation, and may also issue any other orders and permits necessary to authorize the association to continue business without interruption upon the filing of its articles of incorporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Power to Reorganize, Merge, Consolidate, or Transfer Assets [5750. - 5762.]

5750.

(a) Pursuant to a plan or agreement (referred to as “agreement” in this article) adopted by the board of directors and approved by the commissioner as fair, just and equitable, and as adequately protecting the interests of the association, its members, or stockholders, its savings account holders and the public, an association shall have the power to reorganize or to merge or consolidate with or transfer all or substantially all its assets to another association or federal association, or any other corporation, provided that the principal terms of the plan of the reorganization, merger, consolidation, or transfer shall, in the case
 of a stock association, be approved at an annual meeting or at any special meeting, or by the written consent of the stockholders voting on the action, by not less than a majority of the total number of votes eligible to be cast. In the case of a mutual association, if required by the commissioner, the principal terms of such a plan shall be approved by members representing not less than a majority of the voting power.

(b) In all cases the survivor association shall succeed to all the rights, obligations, and relations of the constituent associations.

(c) As a step in a plan of the reorganization, merger, consolidation, or transfer under this section, an interim corporation may be formed. As used in this section, “interim corporation” means a corporation formed to facilitate the acquisition of 100 percent of the voting stock of an existing association or other insured stock
 institution by or for a newly formed company or an existing savings and loan holding company or to facilitate any other transaction the commissioner may approve.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 730, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

5751.

At the sole discretion of the commissioner a public hearing may be held on applications filed under this article, in accordance with procedures established by the commissioner by regulation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5752.

Applications filed under this article shall be accompanied by any applicable filing fee prescribed by the commissioner pursuant to Section 9001.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5753.

The provisions of Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 1300) of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code shall apply only to stockholders and shares of stock owned by them in the association being merged, or where assets are being transferred into a surviving association, or where a merger or transfer is approved under the provisions of this article by written consent of the stockholders.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5754.

In a merger the agreement shall state any matters with respect to which the articles of the surviving association are deemed amended and the articles shall be amended accordingly, without any further proceedings, upon the effective date of the merger, but with respect to any amendments, the agreement shall meet the requirements of Section 907 of the Corporations Code in identifying any provisions to be amended, stricken, or added and shall set forth in full the wording of the provision as amended or added or the wording of the amended articles if they be amended in full.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5755.

When a merger or consolidation agreement has been approved by the directors and the stockholders or members of an association, the association shall mail notice of the approval to each of its stockholders or members at least 10 days before filing the certificate as provided in this section unless the consents of all stockholders or members entitled to vote have been solicited and received in writing.

After approval by the directors and stockholders or members has been given, the association shall prepare and submit to the commissioner for written approval a certificate in the form of an officers’ certificate
 (Section 173 of the Corporations Code) which shall set forth the following:

(a) An identification of the agreement of merger or consolidation by reference to names of parties and date.

(b) That the agreement was approved by the board of directors of the association.

(c) The total number of outstanding shares of each class of stock entitled to vote, or in the case of a mutual association the total value of accounts outstanding.

(d) That the principal terms of the agreement were approved by the vote or written consent of a number of shares of each class of stock which equaled or exceeded the vote required, or in the case of a mutual association that approval by the members was not required by the commissioner or that the principal terms of the agreement
 were approved by the vote or written consent of members holding a total value of accounts which equaled or exceeded the vote required.

(e) The percentage vote required of each class.

(f) That the agreement for merger or consolidation submitted to the commissioner for written approval and for filing with the Secretary of State concurrently with this certificate is the agreement hereinabove referred.

(g) Any additional matters that the commissioner may require.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 361, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

5756.

Any amendment to a merger or consolidation agreement may be adopted, and the agreement so amended may be approved at the meeting of the stockholders or members of any of the associations or by written consent of the stockholders or members, in the same manner and by the same vote as the original agreement. If the agreement so amended is approved at a meeting or by written consent by the stockholders or members and by the board of directors of each of the associations by the vote or written consent required for approval of the original agreement, the agreement so amended shall be signed and acknowledged and shall have certified therewith the approval of the
 directors and of the stockholders or members in the same manner as provided for in the original agreement, and shall then constitute the merging or consolidating agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5757.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the approval of transactions under this article shall not be required by any borrowers or by holders of savings accounts in associations that issue stock.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5758.

The executed agreement, or an executed counterpart of it and the respective certificate of each constituent association or any other corporation and of the surviving association shall be filed with the Secretary of State. Neither the agreement nor any certificate shall be filed, however, unless the commissioner’s written approval is attached. The effective date of the merger or consolidation under this article shall be the date of the filing with the Secretary of State of the copy of the approved agreement of merger or consolidation. A copy of the approved
 agreement certified by the Secretary of State shall be filed with the commissioner.

If the resulting association is a federal association, the effective date of merger shall be the date the merger is effective under regulations of the Office of Thrift Supervision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 773, Sec. 47.   Effective September 29, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

5759.

An association may acquire all or at least 90 percent of the issued and outstanding stock of another association, or any other corporation, with the prior written approval of the commissioner upon conditions that the commissioner may impose as a step in a plan of merger to be approved by the commissioner. The acquisition of stock shall be upon terms as may be approved by the board of directors of the acquiring association and ratified by the vote or written consent of holders of a majority of the outstanding stock of each class of stockholders of the acquiring association.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 868, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

5760.

(a) Any association, owning all the outstanding stock of any corporation, may merge its wholly owned subsidiary corporation if the laws under which the subsidiary corporation exists permit a merger as this section provides. The association shall submit to the commissioner for approval a certificate of ownership in its name signed by its president or a vice president, and its secretary or an assistant secretary, which shall be verified by their affidavit, stating, in effect, that the matters set forth in the certificate are true of their
 own knowledge. The certificate shall set forth:

(1) That it owns all the outstanding stock of the merged corporation.

(2) A copy of the resolution adopted by its board of directors to merge the corporation, and to assume all of its obligations.

(3) The time and place of the meeting of the board of directors at which the resolution was adopted, and the vote by which it was adopted.

(b) If an association owns less than all the outstanding stock but at least 90 percent of the outstanding shares of stock of each class of a corporation or corporations, domestic or foreign, the merger of the subsidiary corporation or corporations into the parent association may be effected by resolutions adopted by the boards of the parent and each subsidiary corporation, and
 the filing of a certificate of ownership as provided in subdivision (d). The resolution of the board of the parent association shall provide for the merger, shall provide that the parent association assumes all the liabilities of each subsidiary corporation and shall set forth the securities, cash property or rights to be issued, paid, delivered or granted by the parent association upon surrender of each share of stock of each subsidiary corporation not owned by the parent association. The resolution of the board of each subsidiary corporation shall approve the fairness of the consideration to be received for each share of stock of the subsidiary corporation not owned by the parent association.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in any merger pursuant to this section, the parent association may change its name regardless of whether the name so adopted is the same or similar to that of one of the disappearing associations. In this
 case the resolution shall provide for the amendment of articles to change the name.

(d) After adoption of the resolution or resolutions of merger, as provided under subdivision (b), the association shall submit to the commissioner for approval a certificate of ownership in its name signed by its president or a vice president, and its secretary or an assistant secretary, which shall be verified by their affidavit, stating, in effect, that the matters set forth in the certificate are true of their own knowledge. The certificate shall set forth:

(1) That the association owns at least 90 percent of the outstanding stock of the merged corporations.

(2) A copy of the resolution adopted by the association’s board of directors to merge the corporation, to assume all of its obligations, and including the resolution for a
 change of name if applicable.

(3) A copy of the resolution or resolutions adopted by the board of each subsidiary corporation, if required.

(4) The time and place of the meeting of the boards of directors of the parent and the subsidiary at which the resolutions were adopted, and the vote by which they were adopted.

(e) In the event all of the outstanding shares of stock of a subsidiary domestic corporation party to a merger effected under this section are not owned by the parent association immediately prior to the merger, the parent association shall, at least 20 days before the effective date of the merger, give notice to each stockholder of the subsidiary corporation that the merger will become effective on or after a specific date, which notice shall contain (1) a copy of the resolutions of the boards of
 directors of the parent and the subsidiary required by subdivision (b) above and (2) the information which must accompany the notice required by subdivision (a) of Section 1301 of the Corporations Code. The notice shall be sent by mail addressed to the stockholder at the address of the stockholder as it appears on the records of the corporation. The stockholder shall have the right to demand payment of cash for the shares of stock of the stockholder pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 1300) of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code.

(f) If a merger authorized by this section is approved, the commissioner shall attach to the certificate written approval, and the certificate shall be filed with the Secretary of State. A copy of the approved certificate certified by the Secretary of State shall be filed with the commissioner. Thereupon, all of the estate, property, rights, privileges, and franchises of the
 merged corporation shall vest in and be held and enjoyed by the parent association as fully as the same were before held and enjoyed by the merged corporation, but subject to all the liabilities and obligations of the merged corporation and the rights of all creditors. The parent association shall not, however, thereby acquire the right to engage in any business or to exercise any right, privilege, or franchise of a kind which it could not lawfully engage in or exercise under the provisions of this division. The parent association shall be deemed to have assumed all the liabilities and obligations of the merged corporation, and shall be liable in the same manner as if it had itself incurred the liabilities and obligations.

(g) If the merged subsidiary is a domestic corporation, a copy of the certificate shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State on behalf of the subsidiary corporation. If the merged subsidiary is a foreign
 corporation qualified for the transaction of intrastate business in this state there shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State on behalf of the foreign subsidiary a certificate of surrender and right to transact intrastate business as provided in Section 2112 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 773, Sec. 48.   Effective September 29, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

5761.

The directors of an association may, in their discretion, abandon a transaction under this article, subject to the rights of third parties under any contracts relating thereto, without further action or approval by the stockholders or members of the association, at any time before the transaction has been completed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5762.

The commissioner may adopt rules and regulations relating to any transaction regulated by this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Holding Companies and Stock Acquisitions [5800. - 5811.]

5800.

For the purposes of this article the following words and phrases shall have the following meanings:

(a) “Savings and loan holding company” means any person that either, directly or indirectly, or acting in concert with one or more other persons:

(1) Owns, controls, or holds with power to vote, or holds proxies to vote:

(A) Where the association or savings and loan holding company has fewer than 500 stockholders or members, 25 percent or more of the outstanding
 voting capital stock of any capital stock association or savings and loan holding company or 25 percent or more of the total number of votes or proxies of votes eligible to be cast by the members of any mutual association located in this state.

(B) Where the association or savings and loan holding company has at least 500 stockholders or members, 10 percent or more of the outstanding voting capital stock of any capital stock association or savings and loan holding company or 10 percent or more of the total number of votes or proxies of votes eligible to be cast by the members of any mutual association located in this state.
